Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DREAMS TAKE FLIGHT.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Little Falls for the Dreams Take Flight show to commemorate 100 years of transatlantic flight and Minnesota native Charles Lindbergh's aviation accomplishment. new text end